Hawaii statutes.
§147-59 Continuous factory inspection;
request necessary; labels or marks. The board of agriculture may designate
any employee or agent of the department of agriculture to perform continuous
factory inspection or classification of food products, in accordance with such
rules and regulations as the department may prescribe, at the request of
persons having an interest in the products, and to ascertain and certify to the
persons the grade, classification, quality, or condition thereof and such other
pertinent facts as the department may require. Such inspections,
classifications and certifications shall be requested, and in no case shall be
required by the department.

Subject to rules and regulations prescribed by
the department, an appropriate state label or mark or marks, established and
adopted by the department, may be used on packages or containers of food
products which are so continuously inspected and graded and are found to meet
the official grades or standards of the department shown on the label or by the
mark or marks. The labels shall include a statement of the official grade or
standard of the product contained in the package or container, as graded or
classified under this part, and may include, in whole or in part, a facsimile
of the seal of the department. The department may register any label as a
trademark under the laws of the State or may register it with the United States
government and any state or foreign government.

The department may fix, assess, and collect, or
cause to be collected, fees for the use of labels or marks or may print and
sell the labels, at charges to be fixed by the department, to persons
authorized to use them on packages or containers, or may rent dies or cuts of
labels or marks, at a charge to be fixed by the department, to persons
authorized to use them. [L 1947, c 195, §9; RL 1955, §22-48; am L Sp 1959 2d, c
1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §147-59]

Cross References

Trademarks, see
chapter 482.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next